District of Columbia statutes.
7-2045

Judicial review.

A person aggrieved by a final decision of the Mayor may appeal the decision to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals pursuant to § 2-510.

History

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 16, 46 DCR 274

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3635.

Temporary Addition of Section

See notes to § 7-2031.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.